Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.420

Signage for 988 national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline.

(1)(a) For any building, bridge, ferry, or park being constructed or replaced after July 1, 2024, as a public works project, there must be installed in appropriate locations signs displaying the 988 national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline.

(b) The public body as defined in RCW 39.10.210 in control of a public works project in this subsection must decide where signs under this section would be physically feasible and appropriate. The following facilities are recommended to have such signs:

(i) Bridges where suicides by jumping have occurred or are likely to occur; and

(ii) Locations that provide services to people that have high incidence of suicide or mental health conditions that would benefit from knowing about the hotline.

(c) The signs must be designed to communicate that dialing 988 on a telephone will connect callers to behavioral health and suicide prevention services as provided in accordance with state and federal laws governing the 988 number.

(d) If a sign is located along a state highway or the interstate system, the department of transportation must approve the location prior to erecting the sign, but no permit is necessary.

(e) Signs created under this section may not conflict with provisions of the manual of uniform traffic control devices or existing state laws related to placement and design of signs.

(2) This section does not create a private right of action by, or a legal duty to, any party, and may not be used to impose liability on the public body if a sign has or has not been erected on its property. The state of Washington, including all of its agencies, subdivisions, employees, and agents, shall not be liable in tort for any violation of this section, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

(3) The public body may accept gifts or donations to pay for the creation, installation, or maintenance of signs under this section.

[ 2022 c 191 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 191 s 11: "Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2022 c 191 s 14.]

Findings—Intent—2022 c 191: See note following RCW 43.60A.260.